South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3348.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 5, Chapter 1, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-1-505.  (A) All registered nurses and doctors practicing in this State may apply for student loan forgiveness in accordance with the guidelines set out by the department. (B) Each year the General Assembly shall appropriate funds from the general fund, as necessary, to fund the student loan forgiveness described in this section. (C) The department shall promulgate regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this section. The department also shall establish guidelines and procedures necessary to carry out the provisions of this section and publish those guidelines and procedures on its website. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----